Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 1

Formation

45-4-101. Corporation for carrying on credit union — Formation — Par value of shares.

Seven (7) persons, residents of this state, who are all bona fide residents of this state and who have a common bond of occupation and association or reside within a well defined neighborhood, community or rural district, by complying with this chapter, may become together with others who may hereafter be associated with them or their successors, a body corporate for the purpose of carrying on a credit union as herein provided.

The par value of the shares of capital stock shall be five dollars ($5.00).

The commissioner of financial institutions may designate or approve, upon application, charters for credit unions to be designated as central credit unions and each of which must contain in its name the word “central.” A proposed central credit union must also meet the following criteria:

Fulfillment of such requirements as would apply to any other credit union chartered pursuant to this title and chapter;

Demonstrated need for central credit union services of the one (1) or more areas of the state, or if appropriate, the entire state, that would be served by the proposed central credit union, giving particular consideration to the adequacy of existing central credit unions serving the state; and

The ability of the field of membership and the area to be served to support the proposed central credit union, giving consideration to:

The competition offered by existing central credit unions;

The history of the potential field of membership and area to be served as it is related to the potential support for an additional central credit union;

Opportunities for profitable employment for central credit union funds as indicated by the commissioner's review of credit union transactions and the number of potential credit union members of the proposed central credit union; and

Other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposed central credit union and its relationship to the proposed field of membership, that, in the opinion of the commissioner, may be relevant.

Membership in a central credit union initially shall include not less than fifteen (15) credit unions organized and operating under this chapter or under any other credit union act, and may also include, but not be limited to:

Officers, directors, committee members and employees of the credit unions; officials and employees of any association of credit unions; and employees of federal or state government agencies responsible for the supervision of credit unions in this state;

Organizations and associations of credit unions or of those persons or organizations enumerated in subdivision (d)(1);

Employees of an employer with insufficient numbers to form or conduct the affairs of a separate credit union, as determined by the commissioner;

Persons in the field of membership of liquidated credit unions or of credit unions that have entered into or are about to enter into voluntary or involuntary liquidation proceedings; and

Members of the immediate families of all members qualified in subdivisions (d)(1)-(4).

Acts 1923, ch. 68, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 2198a3, 2198a4; Code 1932, § 3833; Acts 1937, ch. 264, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3833 (Williams, §§ 3832.1, 3833); Acts 1978, ch. 552, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1802; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 5.

Cross-References. Bank deposits and collections, title 47, ch. 4.

Central credit unions, dividends, §45-4-503.

Central credit unions, power to borrow, §45-4-502.

Funds transfers, title 47, ch. 4A.

Letters of credit, title 47, ch. 5.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Tennessee Reciprocal Savings Institution Act, title 45, ch. 3, part 14.

Law Reviews.

Common Sense of the Common Bond: Banks, Federal Credit Unions, and Field of Membership Rules, 66 Tenn. L. Rev. 1201 (1999).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

45-4-102. Submission of bylaws and amendments to bylaws — Provisions.

At the time of applying for a charter of incorporation, the incorporators of the credit union shall submit, in duplicate, sets of bylaws with the acknowledgment of their adoption to the commissioner, which shall provide:

The date of the annual meeting, which shall be at any time in January, February or March of each year, the manner of notification of meetings, conducting the same, the number of members constituting a quorum, and regulations as to voting;

The number of directors, which shall be not less than five (5), all of whom must be members, their powers and duties, together with the duties of officers elected by the board of directors;

The qualifications for membership;

The conditions under which shares may be issued, transferred, and withdrawn, members' special accounts may be received and withdrawn, loans may be made and repaid and funds of the corporation may be otherwise invested; and

The charges, if any, that will be made for failure to meet obligations punctually, whether or not the corporation will have the power to borrow, the method of receipting for money, the manner of accumulating a reserve fund and determining a dividend and other matters, consistent with this chapter, that may be required to perfect the organization and make possible the operation of the credit union in question.

Upon adoption of any amendments to its bylaws, the credit union shall submit duplicate copies to the commissioner. No amendment of the bylaws of the credit union shall become effective until approved in writing by the commissioner.

The credit union may adopt, subject to the approval of the commissioner, bylaws that substantially follow the National Credit Union Administration (NCUA) Federal Credit Union Bylaws or the NCUA Standard Bylaw Amendments. Any credit union adopting bylaw provisions in accordance with either the NCUA Federal Credit Union Bylaws or the NCUA Standard Bylaw Amendments may operate the credit union in accordance with the bylaws, notwithstanding other sections of this chapter to the contrary.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 2198a6; Code 1932, § 3834; Acts 1963, ch. 30, § 1; 1967, ch. 227, § 2; Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1803; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 5; 1987, ch. 100, § 1; 1989, ch. 223, § 1; 1992, ch. 591, §§ 1, 2.

45-4-103. Certificate of approval issued by commissioner of financial institutions on approval.

The commissioner shall approve the certificate of organization, and the bylaws, and if satisfied that the proposed field of operation is favorable to the success of the corporation and that the standing of the proposed incorporators is such as to give assurance that its affairs will be properly administered, the commissioner shall issue to the proposed incorporators a certificate of approval, annexed to the duplicate of the certificate of organization and of the bylaws.

Acts 1923, ch 68, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 2198a7; Code 1932, § 3835; Acts 1937, ch. 264, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3835; Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1804; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 5.

45-4-104. Use of words “credit union” in name or title regulated.

The use by any person, corporation, association or copartnership, except corporations formed under this chapter, of any name or title that contains the words “credit union” is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 2198a8; Code 1932, § 3836; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1805; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.